Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 3

Appointment by Chancery Court

30-1-301. Jurisdiction.

The chancery court of the county in which any person resided at the time of the decedent's death, or in which the decedent's estate, goods, and chattels or effects were at the time of the decedent's death, may appoint an administrator when six (6) months have elapsed from the death, and no person will apply or can be procured to administer on the decedent's estate.

Code 1858, § 2209 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 1); Shan., § 3943; Code 1932, § 8155; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-301.

Cross-References. Administrators ad litem, § 30-1-109.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Public administrators, guardians, and trustees, title 30, ch. 1, part 4.

Resignation of representative, § 30-1-112.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 121.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 45, 553, 573, 574, 837.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189 (1978).

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-302. Contents of bill.

For the purposes of § 30-1-301, the next of kin, or any creditor of the deceased, may file a bill in the chancery court of the county, setting forth the facts of the case, and that no person can be procured to administer on the estate, agreeably to the laws in force, and praying that an administrator be appointed, with such other specific prayers as are required, and for general relief.

Code 1858, § 2210 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 1); Shan., § 3944; Code 1932, § 8156; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-302.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 573, 574.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-303. Bill filed by creditor — Parties.

The bill, if filed by a creditor, shall be on behalf of all other creditors who may wish to come in and be made parties on the usual terms, and the distributees and heirs may be made parties defendants.

Code 1858, § 2211 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 1); Shan., § 3945; Code 1932, § 8157; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-303.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 574.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-304. Bill filed by next of kin — Parties.

If the bill is filed by the next of kin, or any of them, it shall be on behalf of all the distributees and heirs against the creditors, who may become defendants.

Code 1858, § 2212 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 1); Shan., § 3946; Code 1932, § 8158; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-304.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 574.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-305. Appointment of administrator.

Upon the filing of the bill, the court in term, or chancellor or judge in vacation, at chambers, shall appoint an administrator of the estate, upon such terms as the court, chancellor or judge may think best.

Code 1858, § 2213 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 1); Shan., § 3947; Code 1932, § 8159; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-305.

Cross-References. Chancery court, concurrent jurisdiction to appoint, § 16-11-113.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 575.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-306. Bond.

If the appointment is made in vacation, the complainant shall be required to give bond, with surety, in double the value of the estate to be administered, payable to the state, conditioned that the administrator shall render a true inventory of the estate to the court at its next term, so far as it may come to the administrator's knowledge, and that the administrator will deliver the assets over, or place the assets, or the proceeds, under the charge of the court.

Code 1858, § 2214 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 4); Shan., § 3948; Code 1932, § 8160; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-306.

Cross-References. Bond required, form and amount, title 30, ch. 1, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 575, 1138.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-307. Sale of perishable property.

The judge or chancellor may also direct, in the order, that the perishable property belonging to the estate be sold.

Code 1858, § 2215 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 4); Shan., § 3949; Code 1932, § 8161; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-307.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 575.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-308. Administrator party to court proceedings.

The administrator, when appointed, shall be a party to the proceedings in court, and shall be bound by any decree or order in the cause.

Code 1858, § 2216 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 3); Shan., § 3950; Code 1932, § 8162; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-308.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 576.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-309. Guardian appointed for minor.

Where any party interested in the estate is a minor, the court may appoint a guardian for the minor.

Code 1858, § 2217 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 3); Shan., § 3951; Code 1932, § 8163; T.C.A. (orig. ed.) § 30-309.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 574.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-310. Duties of administrator — Removal.

An administrator shall be under the same responsibilities as a receiver in chancery, and shall make reports to the court in the same manner; and be removable from office for neglect or improper conduct, as a receiver may be; and when the administrator is removed, or dies or resigns, the court may appoint a successor.

Code 1858, § 2218 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 2); Shan., § 3952; Code 1932, § 8164; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-310.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 576.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systematic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

30-1-311. Manner of administration.

The administration of the estate shall be conducted under the authority of the chancery court, in the same manner, and under the same rules, as the administration of an insolvent estate.

Code 1858, § 2219 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 177, § 1); Shan., § 3953; Code 1932, § 8165; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-311.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 574, 576.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).